Utah statutes.
4-12-3.   Department authorized to make and enforce rules -- Cooperation
with state and federal agencies authorized.
The department is authorized, subject to Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, to make and enforce such rules as in its
judgment are necessary to administer and enforce this chapter and may
cooperate with, or enter into agreements with, other agencies of this state,
other states, and agencies of the United States in the administration and
enforcement of this chapter.
